Utah statutes.
11-36-202.   Impact fees -- Enactment -- Required and allowed provisions --
Limitations -- Effective date.
(1) (a)  Each local political subdivision and private entity wishing to impose
impact fees shall pass an impact fee enactment.
(b)  The impact fee imposed by that enactment may not exceed the highest fee
justified by the impact fee analysis performed pursuant to Section 11-36-201.
(c)  In calculating the impact fee, a local political subdivision or private
entity may include:
(i)  the construction contract price;
(ii)  the cost of acquiring land, improvements, materials, and fixtures;
(iii)  the cost for planning, surveying, and engineering fees for services
provided for and directly related to the construction of the system
improvements; and
(iv)  debt service charges, if the political subdivision might use impact fees
as a revenue stream to pay the principal and interest on bonds, notes, or
other obligations issued to finance the costs of the system improvements.
(d)  In calculating an impact fee, a local political subdivision may not
include an expense for overhead unless the expense is calculated pursuant to a
methodology that is consistent with:
(i)  generally accepted cost accounting practices; and
(ii)  the methodological standards set forth by the federal Office of
Management and Budget for federal grant reimbursement.
(e)  In calculating an impact fee, each local political subdivision shall base
amounts calculated under Subsection (1)(c) on realistic estimates, and the
assumptions underlying those estimates shall be disclosed in the impact fee
analysis.
(f)  Each local political subdivision and private entity that intends to enact
an impact fee enactment shall:
(i)  at least ten days before the date of the public hearing:
(A)  make a copy of the impact fee enactment available to the public; and
(B)  mail a written copy of the impact fee enactment to:
(I)  the registered agent of the Utah Home Builders Association;
(II)  the registered agent of the Utah Association of Realtors; and
(III)  the registered agent of the Utah Chapter of the Associated General
Contractors of America; and
(ii) (A)  for a municipality, comply with the notice and hearing requirements
of, and, except as provided in Subsection 11-36-401(4)(f), receive the
protections of Sections 10-9a-205 and 10-9a-801;
(B)  for a county, comply with the notice and hearing requirements of, and,
except as provided in Subsection 11-36-401(4)(f), receive the protections of
Sections 17-27a-205 and 17-27a-801; and
(C)  for a local district or special service district, comply with the notice
and hearing requirements of, and receive the protections of, Section
17B-1-111.
(g)  Nothing contained in Subsection (1)(f) may be construed to require
involvement by a planning commission in the impact fee enactment process.
(2)  The local political subdivision or private entity shall ensure that the
impact fee enactment:
(a)  contains:
(i)  a provision establishing one or more service areas within which the local
political subdivision or private entity calculates and imposes impact fees for
various land use categories;
(ii) (A)  a schedule of impact fees for each type of development activity that
specifies the amount of the impact fee to be imposed for each type of system
improvement; or
(B)  the formula that the local political subdivision or private entity, as
the case may be, will use to calculate each impact fee;
(iii)  a provision authorizing the local political subdivision or private
entity, as the case may be, to adjust the standard impact fee at the time the
fee is charged to:
(A)  respond to:
(I)  unusual circumstances in specific cases; or
(II)  a request for a prompt and individualized impact fee review for the
development activity of the state or a school district or charter school; and
(B)  ensure that the impact fees are imposed fairly; and
(iv)  a provision governing calculation of the amount of the impact fee to be
imposed on a particular development that permits adjustment of the amount of
the fee based upon studies and data submitted by the developer; and
(b)  allows a developer to receive a credit against or proportionate
reimbursement of an impact fee if the developer:
(i)  dedicates land for a system improvement;
(ii)  builds and dedicates some or all of a system improvement; or
(iii)  dedicates a public facility that the local political subdivision or
private entity and the developer agree will reduce the need for a system
improvement.
(3) (a)  A local political subdivision or private entity may include a
provision in an impact fee enactment that:
(i)  provides an impact fee exemption for:
(A)  development activity attributable to:
(I)  low income housing;
(II)  the state;
(III)  a school district; or
(IV)  a charter school; or
(B)  other development activity with a broad public purpose; and
(ii)  establishes one or more sources of funds other than impact fees to pay
for that development activity.
(b)  An impact fee enactment that provides an impact fee exemption for
development activity attributable to a school district or charter school shall
allow either a school district or a charter school to qualify for the
exemption on the same basis.
(4)  A local political subdivision or private entity shall include a provision
in an impact fee enactment that requires a credit against impact fees for any
dedication of land for, improvement to, or new construction of, any system
improvements provided by the developer if the facilities:
(a)  are system improvements; or
(b) (i)  are dedicated to the public; and
(ii)  offset the need for an identified system improvement.
(5)  A local political subdivision may not impose an impact fee to:
(a)  cure deficiencies in a public facility serving existing development; or
(b)  raise the established level of service of a public facility serving
existing development.
(6)  Notwithstanding the requirements and prohibitions of this chapter, a
local political subdivision may impose and assess an impact fee for
environmental mitigation when:
(a)  the local political subdivision has formally agreed to fund a Habitat
Conservation Plan to resolve conflicts with the Endangered Species Act of
1973, 16 U.S.C. Sec 1531, et seq. or other state or federal environmental law
or regulation;
(b)  the impact fee bears a reasonable relationship to the environmental
mitigation required by the Habitat Conservation Plan; and
(c)  the legislative body of the local political subdivision adopts an
ordinance or resolution:
(i)  declaring that an impact fee is required to finance the Habitat
Conservation Plan;
(ii)  establishing periodic sunset dates for the impact fee; and
(iii)  requiring the legislative body to:
(A)  review the impact fee on those sunset dates;
(B)  determine whether or not the impact fee is still required to finance the
Habitat Conservation Plan; and
(C)  affirmatively reauthorize the impact fee if the legislative body finds
that the impact fee must remain in effect.
(7) (a)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter:
(i)  an impact fee to pay for a public safety facility that is a fire
suppression vehicle may not be imposed on residential components of
development;
(ii)  an impact fee may not be imposed on a school district or charter school
for a park, recreation facility, open space, or trail;
(iii)  an impact fee may not be imposed on development activity that consists
of the construction of a school, whether by a school district or a charter
school, if:
(A)  the school is intended to replace another school, whether on the same or
a different parcel;
(B)  the new school creates no greater demand or need for public facilities
than the school being replaced; and
(C)  the new school and the school being replaced are both within:
(I)  the boundary of the local political subdivision; or
(II)  the jurisdiction of the private entity;
(iv)  an impact fee may not be imposed on a school district or charter school
unless:
(A)  the development resulting from the school district or charter school's
development activity directly results in a need for additional system
improvements for which the impact fee is imposed; and
(B)  the impact fee is calculated to cover only the school district or charter
school's proportionate share of the cost of those additional system
improvements;
(v)  an impact fee for a road facility may be imposed on the state only if and
to the extent that:
(A)  the state's development causes an impact on the road facility; and
(B)  the portion of the road facility related to an impact fee is not funded
by the state or by the federal government; and
(vi)  to the extent that the impact fee includes a component for a law
enforcement facility, the impact fee may not be imposed on development
activity for:
(A)  the Utah National Guard;
(B)  the Utah Highway Patrol; or
(C)  a state institution of higher education that has its own police force.
(b)  If the imposition of an impact fee on a new school is not prohibited
under Subsection (7)(a)(iii) because the new school creates a greater demand
or need for public facilities than the school being replaced, the impact fee
may be based only on the demand or need that the new school creates for public
facilities that exceeds the demand or need that the school being replaced
creates for those public facilities.
(8)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a local political
subdivision may impose and collect impact fees on behalf of a school district
if authorized by Section 53A-20-100.5.
(9)  An impact fee enactment may not take effect until 90 days after it is
enacted.
